District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-517

Effect of indexing errors.

The failure of the filing office to index a record correctly does not affect the effectiveness of the filed record.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576

1. Source. New.

2. Effectiveness of Mis-Indexed Records. This section provides that the filing office’s error in mis-indexing a record does not render ineffective an otherwise effective record. As did former Section 9-401, this section imposes the risk of filing-office error on those who search the files rather than on those who file.